Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-1203
Mutual Finance Assistance Fund; created; use; investment.

The Mutual Finance Assistance Fund is created. The fund shall be used to provide assistance to rural or suburban fire protection districts and mutual finance organizations which qualify under the Mutual Finance Assistance Act. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1998, LB 1120, § 3.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.